Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 2. Bonds Held by State

Cross references. —

As to interstate compacts with reference to water generally, see §§

41-12-101

through

41-12-801

.

§ 41-6-201.
Payment of installments.

Any irrigation or drainage district, all of whose outstanding bonds are held by the state of Wyoming, may, on any date when an installment of principal or interest matures, pay to the state treasurer the whole of any unmatured installment or installments of the principal indebtedness evidenced by any such bond or bonds. Upon receipt of any such payment, said treasurer shall make proper notation thereof upon the bond or bonds to which it is to be applied, and shall also make proper notation of credit for any unaccrued interest upon the installments paid which may be included in any coupon subsequently maturing.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 53, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 122-917; C.S. 1945, § 71-2001; W.S. 1957, § 41-243.

§ 41-6-202.
Payment of installments; construction assessments of landowners.

The owner of any land in any irrigation or drainage district coming within the provisions of W.S.

41-6-201

, may, not less than ten (10) days before the maturity of any installment of principal or interest evidenced by such bonds, pay to the treasurer of the county in which said lands are situated, all or any part of the unmatured portion of any assessment for construction levied against the same to provide for the payment of its proportionate share of the indebtedness evidenced by said bonds. Upon receipt of any such payment, said county treasurer shall cause proper credit to be entered upon the record of said assessment, and thereafter a corresponding reduction shall be made in the annual installments of said assessment to be collected. The acceptance of such payments shall not be construed, however, as relieving any such land from its liability for future assessments made for any lawful purpose. Upon receipt of any such payments, the county treasurer shall promptly remit the same to the state treasurer, who shall, on the date on which the next installment of principal or interest shall mature, credit all payments thus received upon the bonds of the district, as provided in the preceding section, retaining any amount too small to be applied until it shall be sufficiently augmented by future payments to admit of its application as therein provided.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 53, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 122-918; C.S. 1945, § 71-2002; W.S. 1957, § 41-244.

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1929, ch. 53, § 3, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

§ 41-6-203.
Filing of certificate of delinquency; suspension of district commissioners; appointment of special commissioner; powers and duties generally; compensation.

If the bonds or other obligations, or any part thereof, of any drainage or irrigation district, which are owned by the state of Wyoming, are in default as to principal or interest or both, or if the state of Wyoming holds an unsatisfied judgment against any drainage or irrigation district for unpaid interest or principal or both, of the bonds of that district which are owned by the state of Wyoming, upon being advised in writing of that fact by the state treasurer, the state loan and investment board shall file a certificate setting forth that fact and stating the amount of the delinquency, the name of the district and the names of the commissioners of the district, with the clerk of the district court having jurisdiction of the drainage or irrigation district the bonds or obligations of which, or any part thereof, are in default or the judgment is unsatisfied. Upon filing the certificate and the filing being called to the attention of the judge of the district court, the judge of the district court shall suspend the commissioners of the district from office.

Immediately upon the suspension of the commissioners as provided in subsection (a) of this section, the state loan and investment board, by and with the consent and approval of the governor, shall appoint a special commissioner for the district who shall be a resident of the state of Wyoming. The governor may remove any special commissioner as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. Any vacancy created by the removal of a special commissioner may be filled by further appointment of another special commissioner for the district by the state loan and investment board, by and with the consent and approval of the governor.

The special commissioner has all the power and authority and shall perform all the duties required by law of commissioners of drainage or irrigation districts, as the case may be, and shall perform his duties in accordance with the laws governing those districts.

Compensation and expenses of the special commissioner shall be paid for by the district.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 79, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-2003; W.S. 1957, § 41-245; Laws 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1998, ch. 13, § 1.

Cross references. —

For subsequent statute affecting §§

41-6-203

through

41-6-206

, see §

41-6-207

.

§ 41-6-204.
Term of special commissioner; appointment of district commissioners after expiration of term.

The special commissioner, or his successor or successors, shall continue in charge of such drainage or irrigation district until a certificate is filed with the clerk of the district court of the district in which said drainage or irrigation district is located by the state loan and investment board to the effect that the delinquency has been removed and that such drainage or irrigation district is in such financial condition that it is believed that the special commissioner is no longer necessary, whereupon commissioners for such district may be appointed by the court, or elected by the district, as the case may be; provided, however, that this shall not prevent the subsequent appointment of a special commissioner for any of the reasons provided in W.S.

41-6-203

.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 79, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 71-2004; W.S. 1957, § 41-246; Laws 1998, ch. 13, § 1.

Cross references. —

For subsequent statute affecting §§

41-6-203

through

41-6-206

, see §

41-6-207

.

Editor's notes. —

Section

41-6-207

directs the state loan and investment board, immediately after the effective date of that section, to file with the clerk of any district court which has appointed a special commissioner pursuant to the provisions of §

41-6-203

, a certificate that the special commissioner is no longer necessary, even though all delinquency may not have been removed.

§ 41-6-205.
Special commissioner may serve for several districts.

The state loan and investment board may appoint the same person as special commissioner for any number of drainage or irrigation districts.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 79, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 71-2007; W.S. 1957, § 41-247; Laws 1998, ch. 13, § 1.

Cross references. —

For subsequent statute affecting §§

41-6-203

through

41-6-206

, see §

41-6-207

.

§ 41-6-206.
Action by attorney general; service of process; sale of property to satisfy judgment.

Whenever the state loan and investment board deems it advisable after being advised of the default in the payment by any drainage or irrigation district of principal or interest, or both, due to the state of Wyoming upon bonds or other obligations of such drainage or irrigation district owned by the state of Wyoming, it shall instruct the attorney general to take such steps as he deems necessary to collect the amount due. In case an action is filed, process may be served in case a special commissioner has been appointed by leaving a copy thereof with the special commissioner. Any property which the district owns, or in which it has any equity, may be levied upon to satisfy any judgment obtained in the manner now provided by law, except that no appraisement of such property shall be required; and at any sale of property of said district under execution, the state of Wyoming may bid in such property in any amount deemed advisable by the state loan and investment board; provided, however, that no property of the district shall be bid in by the state of Wyoming for a sum in excess of the amount of the judgment held by the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 79, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 71-2005; W.S. 1957, § 41-248; Laws 1998, ch. 13, § 1.

Cross references. —

For subsequent statute affecting §§

41-6-203

through

41-6-206

, see §

41-6-207

.

As to sale of real estate for taxes, see §§

39-13-108

.

§ 41-6-207.
Certificate stating special commissioner no longer necessary to be filed; state loan and investment board to sell equipment; disposition of proceeds.

The state loan and investment board shall immediately, after the effective date of this section, file with the clerk of any district court which has appointed a special commissioner under the provisions of W.S.

41-6-203

, a certificate to the effect that the drainage district for which such special commissioner was appointed is in such financial condition that it is believed that the special commissioner is no longer necessary, which certificate shall comply in all respects with the provisions of W.S.

41-6-204

, except that it shall not be necessary that the certificate state that all delinquency has been removed. The Wyoming farm loan board [state loan and investment board] is further directed to immediately take all necessary steps to sell and dispose of any and all equipment owned by the state loan and investment board or the state of Wyoming and used by such commissioner in the operation of any such drainage district, such sale to be conducted in accordance with the provisions of existing law for the sale of state property. When such sales shall have been completed all proceeds received therefrom shall be paid into the general fund of the state of Wyoming by the state loan and investment board.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 133, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-249; Laws 1998, ch. 13, § 3.

Cross references. —

For earlier provision as to term of special commissioner, see §

41-6-204

.

As to sale of real estate for taxes, see §

39-13-108

.

§ 41-6-208.
Title and control of lands bid in by state; disposition of income.

The title to any lands so bid in shall be taken in the name of the state loan and investment board, and said lands shall be administered, leased and sold by the state loan and investment board, and said board shall have full power and authority to sell, contract for sale, and lease said lands for such prices and upon such terms as the state loan and investment board deems for the best interests of the state. All rentals or income from such lands shall be applied, first, to the payment of the expenses of the administration of such lands, and the balance, if any, together with all proceeds from the sale of such lands, shall be paid to the state treasurer and by him credited to the permanent fund bond account of the drainage or irrigation district in which such lands are located.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 79, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 71-2006; W.S. 1957, § 41-250; Laws 1998, ch. 13, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to purchase of real estate by county for taxes and enforcement of lien acquired by purchase at tax sale, see §§

39-13-107

through

39-13-110

.

§ 41-6-209.
Quorum of board.

A majority of the members of the state loan and investment board shall constitute a quorum to transact any business provided for under W.S.

41-6-203

through

41-6-206

,

41-6-208

and

41-6-209

.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 79, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 71-2008; W.S. 1957, § 41-251; Laws 1998, ch. 13, § 1.